Hawaii statutes.
[§386A-5] Board meetings. (a) The
board's quorum to transact business shall consist of at least three directors.
Unless a quorum is present, no business shall be transacted.

(b) Each director shall have one vote. All
board actions and decisions shall be by majority vote.

(c) Directors shall determine the time and
place of the board's regular meetings. The fund's administrator shall notify
directors of the time and place of meetings.

(d) Special meetings may be held at the call
of the chairperson or any two directors upon giving at least seven days'
written notice to all other directors. Unless otherwise specified in the call
and notice, meetings shall be held at the fund's principal office.

(e) Directors shall elect a chairperson,
secretary, and treasurer and other officers as it decides.

(f) Directors may also exercise their powers
by written assent of all directors. [L 1985, c 296, pt of §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next